Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 19

CAPTIVE
INSURANCE COMPANIES

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Part I designation added by L 2008, c 190, §2.

§431:19-101 Definitions. As used in
this article:

"Administrator" means the captive
insurance administrator established in section 431:19-101.5.

"Affiliated entity" means any
company, person, or other entity in the same corporate system as a parent or a
member organization by virtue of common ownership, control, operation, or
management.

"Association" means two or more
members who are engaged in business or activities similar or related to the
liability to which these members are exposed by virtue of any related, similar,
or common business trade, product, services, premises, or operations; provided
that the members of the association shall be individuals, corporations, limited
liability companies, partnerships, associations, or other entities, except
labor organizations, the member organizations of which or which does itself,
whether or not in conjunction with some or all of the member organizations:

(1) Own, control, or hold with power to vote all of
the outstanding voting securities of an association captive insurance company
incorporated as a stock insurer;

(2) Have complete voting control over an association
captive insurance company incorporated as a mutual insurer;

(3) Constitute all of the subscribers of an
association captive insurance company formed as a reciprocal insurer; or

(4) Have complete voting control over an association
captive insurance company formed as a limited liability company.

"Association captive insurance
company" means a captive insurance company that insures risks of the
member organizations of the association, and that may insure the risks of
affiliated entities of the member organizations and the risks of the
association itself.

"Branch captive insurance company"
means an outside captive insurance company licensed under this article by the
commissioner to transact the business of insurance in this State through a
business unit that has its principal place of business in this State.

"Captive insurance company" or
"captive insurer" means a class 1 company, class 2 company, class 3
company, class 4 company, or class 5 company formed or authorized under this
article.

"Class 1 company" means a pure captive
insurance company that is designated and licensed in this State to write
business only as a reinsurer.

"Class 2 company" means a pure
captive insurance company that is designated and licensed in this State to
write business as a direct insurer or as a direct insurer and reinsurer.

"Class 3 company" means an
association captive insurance company or risk retention captive insurance
company that is designated and licensed in this State.

"Class 4 company" means a sponsored
captive insurance company that is designated and licensed in this State.

"Class 5 company" means a reinsurance
or excess insurance company that is a captive insurance company designated and
licensed in this State pursuant to section 431:19-111.5.

"Controlled unaffiliated business" means,
in the case of a pure captive insurance company, any person:

(1) That is not in the corporate system of a parent
and its affiliated entities;

(2) That has an existing contractual relationship
with a parent or one of its affiliated entities; and

(3) Whose risks are managed by the pure captive
insurance company.

"Governing body" means the board of
directors, subscriber's advisory committee, membership, or other entity
responsible for the governance of a captive insurance company.

"Leased capital facility". DELETED.

"Member organization" means any
individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association,
or other entity that belongs to an association.

"Organizational document" means a
captive insurance company's articles of association, articles
of incorporation, articles of organization, subscribers' agreement, bylaws, operating agreement, or any other
document that establishes the captive insurance company as a legal entity or
prescribes its existence.

"Outside captive insurance company"
means an insurance company licensed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than
this State and not otherwise admitted to do business as an insurance company in
this State, that insures the risks of its parent or any affiliated entities.

"Parent" means a corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, other entity, or individual, that directly or
indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote more than fifty per cent
of the outstanding voting interests of a pure captive insurance company
organized as a stock corporation, nonprofit corporation, or limited liability
company.

"Participant" means an entity that
meets the requirements of section 431:19-305, and any affiliated entities thereof
that are insured by a sponsored captive insurance company where the losses of
the participant may be limited through a participant contract to the
participant's pro rata share of the assets of one or more protected cells
identified in the participant contract.

"Participant contract" means a
contract by which a sponsored captive insurance company insures the risks of a
participant and may also limit the losses of each participant to its pro rata
share of the assets of one or more protected cells identified in such
participant contract.

"Protected cell" means a separate
account established by a sponsored captive insurance company formed or licensed
under this article in which assets are maintained for one or more participants
in accordance with the terms of one or more participant contracts to fund the
liability of the sponsored captive insurance company assumed on behalf of the
participants as set forth in the participant contracts.

"Pure captive insurance company"
means a captive insurance company that only insures or reinsures risks of its
parent and affiliated entities or of a controlled unaffiliated business. "Pure
nonprofit captive insurance company" means a pure captive insurance
company formed without capital stock as a nonprofit corporation under chapter
414D, whose voting of membership interest is held by a parent organization
formed under a nonprofit law or by such nonprofit parent and its affiliated
entities.

"Risk retention captive insurance
company" means a captive insurance company that is formed as a "risk
retention group" as defined in chapter 431K.

"Sponsor" means any entity that meets
the requirements of section 431:19-304 and is approved by the commissioner to
provide all or part of the minimum required capital and surplus of a sponsored
captive insurance company and to organize and operate a sponsored captive
insurance company.

"Sponsored captive insurance company"
means a captive insurance company:

(1) In which the minimum required capital and surplus
is provided by one or more sponsors;

(2) That is formed or licensed under this article;

(3) That insures the risks only of its participants
through separate participant contracts; and

(4) That may fund its liability to each participant
through one or more protected cells. A sponsored captive insurance company
segregates the assets of each protected cell from the assets of other protected
cells and from the assets of the sponsored captive insurance company's general
account. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 187, §8; am L 1989, c 207, §15;
am L 1992, c 108, §2; am L 1996, c 248, §1; am L 1998, c 150, §2; am L 1999, c
302, §2; am L 2000, c 36, §2 and c 133, §1; am L 2001, c 194, §3; am L 2002, c
40, §71; am L 2003, c 209, §1; am L 2005, c 31, §1; am L 2007, c 232, §1; am L
2008, c 190, §3; am L 2012, c 253, §2; am L 2014, c 186, §9]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next